Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-2625
Department of Revenue; duties.

(1) The Department of Revenue shall maintain a record of the qualifying children who have received tuition waivers pursuant to the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act.

(2) On or before each August 1, the department shall provide a report to each state university, state college, and community college indicating which tuition waiver recipients have failed to file a tax return with the department to document that such recipients still resided in the State of Nebraska during the preceding year.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 103;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 85-2608;

Laws 2025, LB608, § 18.